Nevada, session 83, AB426.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388G of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
The principal of a local school precinct shall, not later than 45
days after the board of trustees submits the report required
pursuant to NRS 387.303, provide the organizational team for the
local school precinct with a briefing comparing the budget
included in the plan of operation for the local precinct pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 388G.700 for the previous school year with
the actual expenditures of the local school precinct for the
previous school year.
Sec. 2. NRS 388G.700 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388G.700 1. The principal of a local school precinct shall:
(a) Establish an organizational team for the local school precinct
consisting of the members described in NRS 388G.720 on or before
October 1 of each school year;
(b) Develop the proposed plan of operation for the local school
precinct for the next school year with the assistance and advice of
the organizational team;
(c) Before any vote on a proposed plan of operation for the local
school precinct, make every effort to notify the members of the
organizational team for the local school precinct of the date, time
and location of the scheduled vote;
(d) At least 3 days before any vote on a proposed plan of
operation for the local school precinct, send a message through
electronic mail to the members of the organizational team for the
local school precinct that contains a copy of the budget included
in the proposed plan of operation for the local school precinct
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3;
(e) If the proposed plan of operation for the local school precinct
is approved by a vote of at least 75 percent of the members of the
organizational team for the local school precinct who are present at
the time of the vote, submit the proposed plan of operation to the
school associate superintendent for approval; [and
(e)] (f) If the proposed plan of operation for the local precinct is
not approved by a vote of at least 75 percent of the members of the
organizational team who are present at the time of the vote, notify
the school associate superintendent in accordance with NRS
388G.750 [.] ; and
(g) At each meeting in which the organizational team is
scheduled to vote on the proposed plan of operation for the local
school precinct, provide the organizational team with an itemized
-
*AB426_R1*

– 4 –
report describing any expenditures that will not be completed
within 1 year and the reason for the timing of the expenditures.
2. In accordance with the applicable collective bargaining
agreement, the principal of the local school precinct shall select staff
for the local school precinct as necessary to carry out the plan of
operation from a list provided by the superintendent.
3. The plan of operation for the local school precinct must
include, without limitation:
(a) A plan to improve the achievement of pupils enrolled in the
local school precinct, regardless of whether such a plan is required
to be prepared pursuant to NRS 385A.650; and
(b) A budget which itemizes the manner in which the local
school precinct will use the money allocated to the local school
precinct.
4. The budget included in the plan of operation for the local
school precinct pursuant to subsection 3 must be based upon the
average unit cost for each type of employee of the local school
precinct established pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 388G.650, the actual cost for the procurement of equipment,
services and supplies for the local school precinct and the actual cost
of any other item included in the budget of the local school precinct.
The budget must be developed in accordance with the criteria for
determining budgetary priorities established by the board of trustees
of the large school district pursuant to NRS 387.301.
Sec. 3. NRS 388G.710 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388G.710 1. Before the organizational team conducts a vote
on approving a plan of operation for the local school precinct, the
principal of the local school precinct shall present the plan at a
public meeting held in accordance with [subsection] subsections 2
and 3 at the local school precinct to which the plan of operation
applies.
2. The principal shall [post] :
(a) Post notice of the meeting not less than 3 working days
before the date on which the meeting will be held [.] ;
(b) Send a copy of the agenda for the meeting to the parents or
legal guardian of a pupil enrolled in the local school precinct by
electronic mail or through other electronic means not less than 3
working days before the date on which the meeting will be held,
unless a parent or legal guardian of a pupil opt not to receive a
copy of the agenda; and
(c) Post a copy of the agenda and minutes for the meeting on
the Internet website maintained by the local school precinct. Any
agendas or minutes posted pursuant to this paragraph must
remain posted on the Internet website maintained by the local
school precinct for not less than 3 years.
-
*AB426_R1*

– 5 –
3. Members of the public must be allowed to attend any portion
of the meeting, except any portion of the meeting during which
confidential information is discussed, and each meeting must
include a period for public comment. A meeting held pursuant to
this [subsection] section is not subject to the provisions of chapter
241 of NRS.
[3.] 4. Before any vote on a proposed plan of operation for the
local school precinct, the principal of the local school precinct must
make every effort to notify the members of the organizational team
for the local school precinct of the date, time and location of the
scheduled vote.
[4.] 5. The principal shall not finalize the plan of operation for
the local school precinct unless the plan of operation has been
approved by at least 75 percent of the members of the organizational
team who are present at the time of the vote. If the plan of operation
for the local school precinct is finalized by the principal, the
principal must submit the plan to the school associate superintendent
for approval. After receipt of the plan of operation pursuant to this
subsection, the school associate superintendent must approve or
deny the plan of operation within 10 days. The plan of operation
must be approved unless any provision of the plan violates any
federal or state law or policy of the large school district.
[5.] 6. If the school associate superintendent:
(a) Approves the plan of operation for a local school precinct,
the school associate superintendent must notify the principal of the
local school precinct and cause the plan of operation to be posted on
the Internet website of the large school district and on the Internet
website of the local school precinct and make the plan of operation
available to any person upon request. The plan of operation must
remain posted on the Internet website of the large school district
and on the Internet website of the local school precinct for not less
than 5 years.
(b) Does not approve the plan of operation for a local school
precinct, the school associate superintendent must notify the
principal of the local school precinct of the reasons for not
approving the plan and post those reasons on the Internet website of
the large school district and on the Internet website of the local
school precinct and make the plan of operation available to any
person upon request. The school associate superintendent must
assist the principal as necessary to revise the plan of operation.
[6.] 7. [Any] For any adjustment to the budget that the
principal of the local school precinct determines is necessary after
the plan of operation has been approved pursuant to this section or
NRS 388G.750 [may] :
-
*AB426_R1*

– 6 –
(a) If the adjustment to the budget is at least $80,000 for an
elementary or middle school or $125,000 for a high school, the
adjustment may not be made unless the principal:
(1) Notifies the organizational team before making the
adjustment; and
(2) Schedules and holds a meeting of the organizational
team in accordance with subsection 3 of NRS 388G.730 and the
school associate superintendent not later than 10 days after the
notification of the adjustment unless exigent circumstances
require otherwise; or
(b) If the adjustment to the budget is less than $80,000 for an
elementary or middle school or $125,000 for a high school, the
adjustment may be made upon consultation with the organizational
team and approval of the school associate superintendent.
8. Before any expenditure of money generated for the local
school precinct by pupils enrolled at the local school precinct, the
organizational team must approve the expenditure.
Sec. 4. NRS 388G.720 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388G.720 1. The organizational team for a local school
precinct must consist of:
(a) The principal of the local school precinct who shall serve as
a voting member.
(b) At least two but not more than four members, as determined
by the principal, who are teachers or other licensed educational
personnel at the local school precinct who are elected by a vote of
the teachers and other licensed educational personnel at the local
school precinct and at least one-half of whom are members of the
association representing teachers and other licensed educational
personnel. The association shall establish the process for nominating
and electing the members pursuant to this paragraph, which must
allow all teachers and other licensed educational personnel an
opportunity to participate and be elected regardless of whether the
teachers or other licensed educational personnel are members of the
association.
(c) One member who is employed at the local school precinct,
other than a teacher or other licensed educational personnel, who is
elected by a vote of all such employees, other than teachers or other
licensed educational personnel, except that if four members are
elected pursuant to paragraph (b), then two members who are
elected by a vote of all such employees and who are members of an
organization that represents those employees. The organization that
represents those employees shall establish the process for
nominating and electing the members pursuant to this paragraph,
which must allow any eligible employee an opportunity to vote
regardless of whether the employee is a member of the organization.
-
*AB426_R1*

– 7 –
(d) A number of parents or legal guardians of pupils who are
enrolled at the local school precinct which represents 50 percent of
the total number of voting members if possible, or, if fewer are
available to accept membership, then the greatest number of parents
or legal guardians available. The parents or legal guardians must be
elected by a vote of all parents and legal guardians of pupils
enrolled at the local school precinct. A parent or legal guardian who
is a teacher or other licensed educational personnel or employee of
the local school precinct may not be elected to serve as a member
pursuant to this paragraph, but may be elected to serve as a member
of the organizational team pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c), as
applicable. The parents or legal guardians who receive the most
votes of those not elected pursuant to this paragraph must be
designated as alternates in the event that a vacancy must be filled
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 7 of NRS 388G.730. The
association of parents for the school, if there is one, must establish
the process for nominating and electing these members pursuant to
this paragraph. If no such association exists, the principal of the
local school precinct must inform all parents and legal guardians of
the opportunity to serve on the organizational team and provide the
parents and guardians with information about the responsibilities
associated with serving as a member of the organizational team, the
manner in which to submit a name to be included on a ballot, the
date on which a vote will be taken and any other relevant
information. The principal must post such information on the
Internet website of the local school precinct and provide the
information to the superintendent who shall post the information on
the Internet website of the large school district. The information
must also be made available to any person upon request.
2. The principal of a local school precinct may not be elected
to an organizational team pursuant to paragraph (b), (c) or (d) of
subsection 1.
3. If one or more specialty schools exist within a local school
precinct, at least one member selected pursuant to paragraphs (b)
and (d) of subsection 1 must represent each specialty school on the
organizational team.
[3.] 4. In addition to the members described in subsection 1, if
the local school precinct is a middle school, junior high school or
high school, the organizational team must have one nonvoting
member who is a pupil enrolled at the local school precinct who is
elected by a vote of all of the pupils enrolled at the local school
precinct. Any pupil who attends the local school precinct may
request to be placed on the ballot to be elected to serve as a member
of the organizational team pursuant to this subsection. A teacher or
administrator of the local school precinct may nominate a pupil but
-
*AB426_R1*

– 8 –
the pupil may only be placed on the ballot if the pupil agrees to have
his or her name placed on the ballot. The principal of the local
school precinct shall cause a vote to be taken of the entire student
body at the local school precinct through secret ballot to elect the
pupil member. A member elected pursuant to this subsection may
only provide assistance and advice regarding the plan of operation
for the local school precinct.
[4.] 5. The organizational team may select one or more
nonvoting advisory members from the community at large to assist
the organizational team and provide input from the community.
Such members must not be the parent or legal guardian of a pupil
who attends the local school precinct and must not otherwise be
qualified to serve as a voting member of the organizational team.
[5.] 6. The principal of a local school precinct shall assist as
necessary with establishing the process for nominating and electing
the members described in subsection 1 and shall ensure that each
member who is elected pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 is
informed that the member is not an employee of the local school
precinct or the large school district and of any potential liability for
serving as a member of the organizational team.
[6.] 7. A person who receives the highest number of votes must
be appointed to the organizational team regardless of the total
number of votes cast for the position.
[7.] 8. The superintendent shall, for each organizational team
established pursuant to NRS 388G.700, collect, organize and
update, as necessary, contact information for each member of the
organizational team. The contact information collected pursuant
to this subsection must be compiled in an accessible directory that
is made available to the staff of the large school district for the
purpose of official communications related to the operation and
governance of the local school precinct for which the
organizational team was established.
9. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an
organizational team and its members who are not employees of the
large school district are immune from liability for civil damages as a
result of an act or omission in performing any of the duties of the
organizational team as set forth in NRS 388G.700 to 388G.750,
inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act. This subsection does not
restrict the liability of a local school precinct or the large school
district for an act or omission of an organizational team or its
members in performing the duties described in NRS 388G.700 to
388G.750, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 5. NRS 388G.730 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388G.730 1. Upon the establishment of an organizational
team pursuant to NRS 388G.700, the principal of the local school
-
*AB426_R1*

– 9 –
precinct shall schedule the first meeting of the team and act as the
chair of the team until a chair is selected. The first item of business
for the organizational team must be to select a chair and vice chair
from among its members.
2. A majority of the voting members of the organizational team
constitutes a quorum for purposes of voting. A majority vote of the
quorum is required to take action with respect to any matter.
3. Notice of a meeting of the organizational team must be
posted not less than 3 working days before the date on which the
meeting will be held. Members of the public must be allowed to
attend any portion of the meeting, except any portion of the meeting
during which confidential information is discussed, and each
meeting must include a period for public comment. A meeting held
pursuant to this subsection is not subject to the provisions of chapter
241 of NRS.
4. Each school associate superintendent shall:
(a) Each year, attend at least one meeting of the
organizational team for each local school precinct overseen by the
school associate superintendent; and
(b) On or before November 1 of each year, send a message
through electronic mail to each member of each such
organizational team which contains:
(1) Instructions for accessing any relevant training
materials; and
(2) Directions for communicating with the school associate
superintendent concerning oversight of the principal of a local
school precinct.
5. Each member of the organizational team serves until
October 1 of the year following his or her election and may serve
additional terms.
[5.] 6. The organizational team must meet not less than one
time each month during the school year.
[6.] 7. If a vacancy occurs in the membership of the
organizational team [, a] :
(a) For a member elected pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of
subsection 1 of NRS 388G.720, the new member must be [elected
in the same manner as the original selection,] the candidate who
received the next highest number of votes in the immediately
preceding election, and the vacancy must be filled within 30 days.
If there is no candidate remaining who received votes in the
immediately preceding election, the vacancy must be filled by
electing a new member in the same manner as the original
selection.
(b) For a member elected pursuant to paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 of NRS 388G.720, the new member must be an
-
*AB426_R1*

– 10 –
alternate designated pursuant to that paragraph, and the vacancy
must be filled within 30 days. If there is no such alternate
remaining, the vacancy must be filled by electing a new member in
the same manner as the original selection.
[7.] 8. Each member of the organizational team [serves] :
(a) Serves without compensation of any kind.
(b) Whether he or she is an employee of the local school
precinct, is entitled to receive the same information necessary to
carry out the duties of the organizational team, as set forth in NRS
388G.700 to 388G.750, inclusive, and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 6. NRS 388G.740 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388G.740 1. An organizational team shall:
(a) Provide assistance and advice to the principal of the local
school precinct regarding the development of the plan of operation
for the local school precinct and vote on whether to approve that
plan of operation;
(b) Provide continued assistance and advice to the principal of
the local school precinct in carrying out the plan of operation for the
local school precinct; and
(c) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the position of principal for
the local school precinct, assist with the selection of the next
principal in accordance with the provisions of this section.
2. The organizational team may provide input regarding the
principal of the local school precinct to the school associate
superintendent not more than two times each school year.
3. Whenever a vacancy occurs in the position of principal for
the local school precinct, the organizational team shall [establish] :
(a) Not later than 7 business days after receiving notice of the
vacancy:
(1) Schedule a meeting, which must be held not later than
14 days after receiving such notice, for the purpose of receiving
input from pupils enrolled in the local school precinct, parents or
legal guardians of such pupils and employees of the local school
precinct concerning the needs of the local school precinct and any
qualifications desired for a candidate for the position of principal
for the local school precinct; and
(2) Notify the large school district of the meeting scheduled
pursuant to subparagraph (1) and the large school district shall
send an electronic communication to each parent or legal
guardian of a pupil enrolled in the local school precinct and
employee of the local school precinct that provides notice of the
meeting scheduled pursuant to subparagraph (1); and
(b) After considering any input received during the meeting
held pursuant to paragraph (a), establish a list of qualifications
that the organizational team [determines] recommends are desirable
-
*AB426_R1*

– 11 –
for the next principal of the local school precinct and provide the list
to the superintendent. The list of qualifications must include,
without limitation, qualifications relating to the:
[(a)] (1) Employment history of the candidate;
[(b)] (2) Ability of the candidate to connect and
communicate with pupils;
[(c)] (3) Ability of the candidate to provide a safe and
respectful learning environment pursuant to NRS 388.1321; and
[(d)] (4) Strategies the candidate would implement to
improve the achievement of pupils.
4. The superintendent shall post notice of the vacancy pursuant
to subsection 3. [The superintendent shall interview qualified
candidates and establish a list of at least three but not more than five
candidates to submit to the organizational team. One member] The
notice must include the list of qualifications established by the
organizational team pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3.
The large school district shall examine the list of candidates and
conduct an interview of at least 5 but not more than 10 candidates,
unless fewer than 5 candidates applied to fill the vacancy, in
which case an interview must be conducted of all candidates. At
least two members of the organizational team must [be allowed to]
participate in interviewing candidates with the superintendent [.] ,
including, at least one member elected pursuant to paragraph (b)
of subsection 1 of NRS 388G.720 and one member elected
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 of NRS 388G.720. Such
an interview must not be conducted unless at least two members of
the organizational team are present at the interview.
5. From the list of candidates submitted by the superintendent
pursuant to subsection 4, the organizational team shall rank the
candidates for the position of principal by preference and submit a
list with that ranking within 15 school days after receipt of the
recommendation. The superintendent, in consultation with the
school associate superintendent, must select a candidate to hire for
the position of principal. Before any vote on the selected candidate,
the school associate superintendent responsible for the local school
precinct must make every effort to notify the members of the
organizational team for the local school precinct of the date, time
and location of the scheduled vote. The organizational team may
reject the selection of the candidate if at least 75 percent of the
members of the organizational team who are present at the time of
the vote elect to do so. The superintendent must then select a
candidate from the remaining members of the list submitted
pursuant to subsection 4. Not later than 10 days after the selection
of a candidate, the organizational team must hold a meeting at the
-
*AB426_R1*

– 12 –
local school precinct to introduce the candidate selected to serve as
principal of the local school precinct.
6. Each person who participates in interviewing candidates
pursuant to this section shall comply with all laws that apply to an
employer when making a decision about employment.
7. After the principal of the local school precinct is hired, the
superintendent may, in his or her sole discretion, reassign and make
other employment decisions concerning the principal.
8. As used in this section, “electronic communication” means
the communication of any written, verbal or pictorial information
through the use of an electronic device, including, without
limitation, a telephone, cellular telephone, electronic mail or any
similar means of communication.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB426_R1*